Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-212
Kindergarten program; minimum hours.

The school board or board of education of any school district offering a kindergarten program shall provide a program of at least four hundred clock hours each school year.

Laws 1967, c. 520, § 1, p. 1742;

Laws 1977, LB 430, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 596, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 79-549;

Laws 1985, LB 633, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201.10;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 16.

Kindergarten, program required, when, see section 79-728.